lexc/noun/enhu2.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Noun +Pref+ [Guess] +CON

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
 
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Forp +Forpen
 
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
 
LEXICON Root
Noun;
Prefik;

LEXICON Prefik
+Pref+:el Noun1; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:le Noun1; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:be Noun1; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ki Noun1; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:meg Noun1; ! optional article prefix
 Noun1;
!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON Noun1
fejezt AddNounjnull; !befejezte

LEXICON Constant
[stem]+CON:0	Object;
[stem]+CON:0	Dative;
[stem]+CON:0	Case;
[stem]+CON:0	#;

LEXICON Object
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^t #; ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON Dative
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l #; ! val, vel
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§ #; ! ra, re

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun:0 Poss;
[stem]+Noun:0 Plur;
[stem]+Noun:0 Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként #; ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l #; ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m Fam; ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d Fam; ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§ Fam; ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk Fam; ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam; ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k Fam; ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im Fam; ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id Fam; ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i Fam; ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink Fam; ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik Fam; !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
 Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k Gen;
 Gen;
 
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék Gen;
 Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi Case;
 Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l #; ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l #; ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z #; ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért #; ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k #; ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l #; ! ról, ről
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l #; ! ból, ből
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l #; ! ul, ül
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§ #; ! vá, vé
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént #; ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp #; ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen #; ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§ #; ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n #; ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l #; ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0 #; ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§ #; ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n #; ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig #; ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNountej1
[stem]+Noun:0 Posstej1;
[stem]+Noun:0 Plur;
[stem]+Noun:0 Fam;

LEXICON Posstej1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként #; ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l #; ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^t #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m Fam; ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d Fam; ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§ Fam; ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§ Fam; ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk Fam; ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam; ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k Fam; ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k Fam; ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im Fam; ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id Fam; ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i Fam; ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink Fam; ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik Fam; !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im Fam; ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id Fam; ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i Fam; ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink Fam; ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik Fam; !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
 Fam;


LEXICON AddNountej
[stem]+Noun:0 Posstej;
[stem]+Noun:0 Plur;
[stem]+Noun:0 Fam;

LEXICON Posstej
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként #; ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l #; ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^t #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m Fam; ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d Fam; ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§ Fam; ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk Fam; ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam; ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k Fam; ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im Fam; ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id Fam; ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i Fam; ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink Fam; ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik Fam; !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
 Fam;


LEXICON AddNouneej
[stem]+Noun:0 Posseej;
[stem]+Noun:0 Plur;
[stem]+Noun:0 Fam;

LEXICON Posseej
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként #; ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l #; ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m Fam; ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d Fam; ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§ Fam; ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk Fam; ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam; ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k Fam; ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im Fam; ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id Fam; ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i Fam; ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink Fam; ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik Fam; !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
 Fam;


LEXICON AddNounrozs
[stem]+Noun:0 Possrozs;
[stem]+Noun:0 Plur;
[stem]+Noun:0 Fam;

LEXICON Possrozs
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként #; ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l #; ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^ot #; ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m Fam; ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d Fam; ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§ Fam; ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk Fam; ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Fam; ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k Fam; ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im Fam; ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id Fam; ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i Fam; ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink Fam; ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k Fam; ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik Fam; !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
 Fam;


LEXICON AddNounjnull
[stem]+Noun:0 Possjnull;
[stem]+Noun:0 Plur;
[stem]+Noun:0 Fam;

LEXICON Noun
agyarkapa AddNoun;
amnéziadarab AddNounjnull;
antilopborjú AddNoun;
antilopfej AddNountej;
anyagnyerőhely AddNouneej;
anyamell AddNountej1;
anyarozs AddNounrozs;
aranyrozs AddNounrozs;
atomfej AddNountej;
atomrács AddNoun;
bankódarab AddNounjnull;
baromfimell AddNountej1;
baromfirács AddNoun;
behúzófej AddNountej;
beszerzőhely AddNouneej;
bikamell AddNountej1;
bitrács AddNoun;
bivalytej AddNountej;
blúzmell AddNountej1;
bohócdarab AddNounjnull;
boszorkánybúvóhely AddNouneej;
boszorkánytej AddNountej;
bronzmell AddNountej1;
budikosz AddNoun;
bundadarab AddNounjnull;
bundamell AddNountej1;
bádogmell AddNountej1;
bálványfej AddNountej;
báránymell AddNountej1;
bíbordaru AddNoun;
búcsúdarab AddNounjnull;
búvárkodóhely AddNouneej;
cethaltej AddNountej;
cigájagyapjú AddNoun;
csalidarab AddNounjnull;
csavarhúzófej AddNountej;
cseréplefedés AddNoun;
csibemell AddNountej1;
csillagsebhely AddNouneej;
csipkerozs AddNounrozs;
csirkedarab AddNounjnull;
csirkemell AddNountej1;
csodafej AddNountej;
csontrács AddNoun;
csontvázmell AddNountej1;
cumifej AddNountej;
címdarab AddNounjnull;
cölöphely AddNouneej;
dadamell AddNountej1;
deszkamell AddNountej1;
dinoszauruszfattyú AddNoun;
disznófej AddNountej;
diákmell AddNountej1;
duódarab AddNounjnull;
déltej AddNountej;
díszítőrács AddNoun;
edénytűzhely AddNouneej;
elszívófej AddNountej;
előlaprács AddNoun;
emblémahely AddNouneej;
erdődarab AddNounjnull;
ezüstpetty AddNoun;
farkaskutyatej AddNountej;
farkasmell AddNountej1;
farács AddNoun;
fegyverdarab AddNounjnull;
fehérítőhely AddNouneej;
felhődiszkosz AddNoun;
felvevőfej AddNountej;
fiókgyűjtőhely AddNouneej;
fodrászkrém AddNounjnull;
forgatórács AddNoun;
forrófej AddNountej;
fuvoladarab AddNounjnull;
fácánmell AddNountej1;
fémlemezfedés AddNoun;
férfiférőhely AddNouneej;
fúvókafej AddNountej;
fődarab AddNounjnull;
gabonarozs AddNounrozs;
generátorlefedés AddNoun;
gennymell AddNountej1;
gerendafej AddNountej;
gleccserszél AddNounjnull;
gombászóhely AddNouneej;
gumimell AddNountej1;
gyalugépfej AddNountej;
gyerekmell AddNountej1;
gyermekszíndarab AddNounjnull;
gyökhely AddNouneej;
gégefej AddNountej;
gémdaru AddNoun;
habarcsdarab AddNounjnull;
halfogóhely AddNouneej;
halálfej AddNountej;
hasítószél AddNounjnull;
hattyúmell AddNountej1;
helikopterfej AddNountej;
hibaelfedés AddNoun;
hibridrozs AddNounrozs;
hintahely AddNouneej;
hordómell AddNountej1;
horogfej AddNountej;
hulladarab AddNounjnull;
hézaglefedés AddNoun;
hókrém AddNounjnull;
hússütőhely AddNouneej;
hősugárzófej AddNountej;
irányítóhely AddNouneej;
iróndarab AddNounjnull;
juhgyapjú AddNoun;
játszófej AddNountej;
jércedarab AddNounjnull;
jércemell AddNountej1;
kabalahely AddNouneej;
kamaszmell AddNountej1;
karamell AddNountej1;
karamellkrém AddNounjnull;
kazeintej AddNountej;
kempingférőhely AddNouneej;
kenderkosz AddNoun;
keresztszél AddNounjnull;
kirakathely AddNouneej;
kockafej AddNountej;
kommentátorhely AddNouneej;
kordonrács AddNoun;
kukoricakrém AddNounjnull;
kultúrhely AddNouneej;
kávénéni AddNoun;
kézfej AddNountej;
kézmosóhely AddNouneej;
körtemell AddNountej1;
középdarab AddNounjnull;
kúrahely AddNouneej;
lefolyórács AddNoun;
lekötőhely AddNouneej;
lemezmell AddNountej1;
leopárdfej AddNountej;
leánykamell AddNountej1;
lufimell AddNountej1;
lábnyomlelőhely AddNouneej;
lágerrab AddNounjnull;
létrarács AddNoun;
lúdmell AddNountej1;
magnófej AddNountej;
medvemenhely AddNouneej;
mell AddNountej1; ! mellet miatt
mentakrém AddNounjnull;
mesefej AddNountej;
minősítőhely AddNouneej;
modellrács AddNoun;
mészégetőhely AddNouneej;
műdarab AddNounjnull;
műsorrács AddNoun;
művej AddNountej;
narancsmell AddNountej1;
nászhely AddNouneej;
odú AddNoun;
oklevéldarab AddNounjnull;
orrszarvútej AddNountej;
parasztmell AddNountej1;
parkolóhely AddNouneej;
passzdarab AddNounjnull;
pax AddNoun;
pisilerakóhely AddNouneej;
plasztikmell AddNountej1;
plombafej AddNountej;
porcelándarab AddNounjnull;
puskahely AddNouneej;
páncélmell AddNountej1;
párkánylefedés AddNoun;
pávamell AddNountej1;
rakodófej AddNountej;
receptorhely AddNouneej;
repertoárdarab AddNounjnull;
rotációskapa AddNoun;
rozs AddNounrozs;
rumkaramell AddNountej1;
selyemdarab AddNounjnull;
spánielfej AddNountej;
szakmunkáshely AddNouneej;
szalagrács AddNoun;
szemkontúrkrém AddNounjnull;
szeráffej AddNountej;
szilikonmell AddNountej1;
szériadarab AddNounjnull;
színházhely AddNouneej;
színpadfedés AddNoun;
sármell AddNountej1;
súrolófej AddNountej;
takarítónéni AddNoun;
takaródarab AddNounjnull;
tartományszékhely AddNouneej;
tengermell AddNountej1;
tintapetty AddNoun;
tolldarab AddNounjnull;
toronyfej AddNountej;
turkálóhely AddNouneej;
térképmell AddNountej1;
töpörtyűdarab AddNounjnull;
törpefasz AddNoun;
törpepulykamell AddNountej1;
utcahely AddNouneej;
vadrozs AddNounrozs;
vajfej AddNountej;
varrónéni AddNoun;
virslidarab AddNounjnull;
vágányhely AddNouneej;
védőfedés AddNoun;
vízfej AddNountej;
zöldborsókrém AddNounjnull;
állatmenhely AddNouneej;
árnyfattyú AddNoun;
ékfej AddNountej;
évelőrozs AddNounrozs;
ökörmell AddNountej1;
örömdarab AddNounjnull;
újságíróhely AddNouneej;
üvegfedés AddNoun;
